Utah statutes.
13-1-5.   Executive director's authority over division directors.
The executive director has policymaking and management jurisdiction over
directors of the divisions and agencies within the department. He shall
appoint the division directors, subject to approval by the governor, unless
otherwise provided by law and shall determine their compensation.
